Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.090

Director's duties and responsibilities—Rules.

The director shall:

(1) Establish overall state policies, standards, and procedures regarding the procurement of goods and services by all state agencies;

(2) Develop policies and standards for the use of credit cards or similar methods to make purchases;

(3) Establish procurement processes for information technology goods and services, using technology standards and policies established by Washington technology solutions under chapter 43.105 RCW;

(4) Enter into contracts or delegate the authority to enter into contracts on behalf of the state to facilitate the purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire all goods and services and equipment needed for the support, maintenance, and use of all state agencies, except as provided in RCW 39.26.100;

(5) Have authority to delegate to agencies authorization to purchase goods and services. The authorization must specify restrictions as to dollar amount or to specific types of goods and services, based on a risk assessment process developed by the department. Acceptance of the purchasing authorization by an agency does not relieve the agency from conformance with this chapter or from policies established by the director. Also, the director may not delegate to a state agency the authorization to purchase goods and services if the agency is not in substantial compliance with overall procurement policies as established by the director;

(6) Develop procurement policies and procedures, such as unbundled contracting and subcontracting, that encourage and facilitate the purchase of goods and services from Washington small businesses, microbusinesses, and minibusinesses, and minority and women-owned businesses to the maximum extent practicable and consistent with international trade agreement commitments;

(7) Develop and implement an enterprise system for electronic procurement;

(8) Provide for a commodity classification system and provide for the adoption of goods and services commodity standards;

(9) Establish overall state policy for compliance by all agencies regarding:

(a) Food procurement procedures and materials that encourage and facilitate the purchase of Washington grown food by state agencies and institutions to the maximum extent practicable and consistent with international trade agreement commitments; and

(b) Policies requiring all food contracts to include a plan to maximize to the extent practicable and consistent with international trade agreement commitments the availability of Washington grown food purchased through the contract;

(10) Develop guidelines and criteria for the purchase of vehicles, high gas mileage vehicles, and alternate vehicle fuels and systems, equipment, and materials, that reduce overall energy-related costs and energy use by the state, including investigations into all opportunities to aggregate the purchasing of clean technologies by state and local governments, and including the requirement that new passenger vehicles purchased by the state meet the minimum standards for passenger automobile fuel economy established by the United States secretary of transportation pursuant to the energy policy and conservation act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 2002); and

(11) Develop and enact rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2024 c 54 s 28; 2012 c 224 s 10.]